Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB153.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The provisions of this section shall be known and may
be cited as the Kansas paid prenatal personal leave act.
(b) On and after January 1, 2026, every employer shall be required to
provide to its employees 20 hours of paid prenatal personal leave during
the calendar year. Paid prenatal personal leave shall mean leave taken for
the healthcare services received by an employee during their pregnancy or
related to such pregnancy, including physical examinations, medical
procedures, monitoring and testing and discussions with a healthcare
provider related to the pregnancy. Paid prenatal personal leave may be
taken in hourly increments. Benefits for paid prenatal personal leave shall
be paid in hourly installments. Employees shall receive compensation at
the employee's regular rate of pay, or the applicable minimum wage,
whichever is greater, for the use of paid prenatal personal leave. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to require an employer to pay an
employee for unused paid prenatal leave upon such employee's
termination, resignation, retirement or other separation from employment.
(c) An employer may not require the disclosure of confidential
information relating to the health condition of such employee as a
condition of providing paid prenatal personal leave pursuant to this
section.
(d) Upon return to work following any paid prenatal leave taken
pursuant to this section, an employee shall be restored by their employer to
the position of employment held by such employee prior to any paid
prenatal leave taken pursuant to this section with the same pay and other
terms and conditions of employment.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or prevent an
employer from providing an amount of paid prenatal personal leave in
excess of the requirements set forth in this section or from adopting a paid
leave policy that provides additional benefits to employees.
(f) (1) An employer or their agent, an officer or agent of any
corporation, partnership or limited liability company or any other person

SB 153 2
shall not discharge, threaten, penalize or in any other manner discriminate
or retaliate against any employee because such employee has exercised
their rights afforded under this section, including, but not limited to,
requesting paid prenatal leave and using paid prenatal leave.
(2) Any employee or former employee aggrieved by a violation of
this section, the department of labor or the attorney general may bring a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against an employer
violating this act. Upon prevailing in an action brought pursuant to this
section, employees and former employees shall be entitled to such legal or
equitable relief as may be appropriate to remedy the violation, including,
but not limited to, reinstatement to employment, back pay and injunctive
relief.
(g) The department of labor shall conduct a public awareness
outreach campaign that includes making information available on its
website and informing employers and employees of the provisions of this
section.
(h) The secretary of labor may adopt such rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement and administer this section.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.